Wyoming, session 2026, HB0144.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-9-203(b) and 39-13-104(e)(iv) are
amended to read:

35-9-203. Powers and duties of board of directors
generally; administration of finances; assessment and levy
of taxes.

HB0144

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0480
(b) The board of county commissioners, at the time of
making the levy for county purposes shall levy a tax for
the year upon the taxable property in such district in its
county for its proportionate share based on assessed
valuation of the estimated amounts of funds needed by each
district. In no case shall the tax for each district exceed
in any one (1) year the amount of three (3) ten (10) mills
for operation on each dollar of assessed valuation of such
property. There shall be no limit on the assessment for
payment of principal and interest on bonds approved by the
board of and the electors of the districts as provided in
W.S. 35-9-204. The taxes and assessments of all fire
protection districts shall be collected by the county
collector at the same time and in the same manner as state
and county taxes are collected. The assessment and tax
levied under the provisions of W.S. 35-9-201 through
35-9-209 shall not be construed as being a part of the
general county mill levy.

39-13-104. Taxation rate.

(e) There shall be annually levied and assessed upon
the taxable value of property within the limits of the
HB0144

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0480
following special districts the following special district
taxes when applicable:

(iv) Not to exceed three (3) ten (10) mills by a
fire protection district as provided by W.S. 35-9-203(b)
plus the number of mills necessary for the payment of the
district debt plus interest thereon not to exceed the
limitations prescribed by W.S. 35-9-204;

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0144